src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-10esaek_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - esäk: # Noun (10) esäk 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     esäk+N+Sg+Nom: esäk
     esäk+N+Sg+Gen: esägu
     esäk+N+Sg+Par: esäkut
     esäk+N+Sg+Ill: esäkuhe
     esäk+N+Sg+Ine: esäkun
     esäk+N+Sg+Ela: esäkust
     esäk+N+Sg+All: esäkulõ
     esäk+N+Sg+Ade: esäkul
     esäk+N+Sg+Abl: esäkult
     esäk+N+Sg+Tra: esäkus
     esäk+N+Sg+Ter: esäkuniq
     esäk+N+Sg+Abe: esäkuldaq
     esäk+N+Sg+Com: esäkugaq
     esäk+N+Pl+Nom: esäguq
     esäk+N+Pl+Gen: esäkide
     esäk+N+Pl+Par: esäkit
     esäk+N+Pl+Ill: esäkihe
     esäk+N+Pl+Ine: esäkin
     esäk+N+Pl+Ela: esäkist
     esäk+N+Pl+All: esäkile
     esäk+N+Pl+Ade: esäkil
     esäk+N+Pl+Abl: esäkilt
     esäk+N+Pl+Tra: esäkis
     esäk+N+Pl+Ter: esäkiniq
     esäk+N+Pl+Abe: esäkildäq
     esäk+N+Pl+Com: esäkidegaq
